src/morphology/stems/acro.lexc
LEXICON Acronym
acros ;
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr2 ;

LEXICON acr2
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr3 ;

LEXICON acr3
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr4 ;
acrotag ;

LEXICON acr4
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr5 ;
acrotag ;

LEXICON acr5
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acrotag ;
acrotag ;

LEXICON acrotag
+N+ACR@D.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@:@D.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@ ACRODELIMITER ; !This prevents predication

LEXICON acros
см³ acrotag ;
°C acrotag ;
K acrotag ; ! Kelvin, Latin letter K

LEXICON ACRODELIMITER
# ;
%' # ; ! who knows
